Maryland, session 2026, SB0755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–731.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ESTABLISH A CATCH AND RELEASE SEASON
FOR STRIPED BASS, COMMONLY KNOWN AS ROCKFISH.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT ANNUALLY SHALL ESTABLISH A
RECREATIONAL AND CHARTER BOAT SUMMER AND FALL STRIPED BASS SEASON
BEGINNING MAY 16 EACH YEAR AND ENDING DECEMBER 10 EACH YEAR.
(2) FOR THE RECREATIONAL SUMMER AND FALL STRIPED BASS
SEASON, A PERSON:
(I) MAY NOT CATCH OR POSSESS MORE THAN ONE STRIPED
BASS PER DAY; AND
(II) MAY USE AS BAIT SHAD OR ARTIFICIAL LURES DESIGNED TO
MIMIC SHAD THAT ARE OF ANY SIZE.
(3) FOR THE CHARTER BOAT SUMMER AND FALL STRIPED BASS
SEASON:
(I) A PERSON MAY NOT CATCH OR POSSESS MORE THAN TWO
STRIPED BASS PER DAY;
(II) NOT MORE THAN 12 LINES PER BOAT MAY BE IN THE WATER
AT ANY ONE TIME;
(III) PLANER BOARDS MAY NOT EXTEND MORE THAN 75 FEET ON
EITHER SIDE OF THE BOAT; AND
(IV) NOT MORE THAN 75 SPOT FISH PER PERSON MAY BE ON
BOARD THE BOAT FOR BAIT.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT ANNUALLY SHALL ESTABLISH A TROPHY
SEASON FOR STRIPED BASS.
(2) (I) THE 2026 TROPHY SEASON FOR CATCHING STRIPED BASS
IS:

SENATE BILL 755 3
1. FROM APRIL 17 THROUGH APRIL 19, INCLUSIVE;
2. FROM APRIL 24 THROUGH APRIL 26, INCLUSIVE; AND
3. FROM MAY 1 THROUGH MAY 3, INCLUSIVE.
(II) IN 2027 AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL ESTABLISH A TROPHY SEASON FOR STRIPED BASS THAT CONSISTS OF:
1. TWO PERIODS OF 3 CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN LATE
APRIL; AND
2. ONE PERIOD OF 3 CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN LATE APRIL
OR EARLY MAY.
(3) DURING TROPHY SEASON, A PERSON MAY NOT CATCH OR POSSESS
STRIPED BASS THAT ARE LESS THAN 28 INCHES IN LENGTH.
(4) DURING THE TROPHY SEASON, A PERSON MAY NOT USE AS BAIT
SHAD OR ARTIFICIAL LURES DESIGNED TO MIMIC SHAD THAT ARE LESS THAN 9
INCHES LONG OR HAVE MORE THAN ONE TRAILER HOOK.
Article – State Government
10–110.
(a) Except for subsection (c) of this section, this section does not apply to a
regulation adopted under § 10–111(b) of this subtitle.
(b) At least 15 days before the date a proposed regulation is submitted to the
Maryland Register for publication under § 10–112 of this subtitle, the promulgating unit
shall submit to the State Children’s Environmental Health and Protection Advisory
Council established under § 13–1503 of the Health – General Article for review any
proposed regulations identified by the promulgating unit as having an impact on
environmental hazards affecting the health of children.
(B–1) AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE A PROPOSED REGULATION
GOVERNING FISHERIES IS SUBMITTED TO THE MARYLAND REGISTER FOR
PUBLICATION UNDER § 10–112 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMITTEE, THE
DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES, AND THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR REVIEW
AN ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT FOR ANY PROPOSED REGULATIONS IDENTIFIED
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AS HAVING A MAJOR IMPACT ON
INTERESTED STAKEHOLDERS.

SENATE BILL 755
(c) (1) (i) At least 15 days before the date a proposed regulation is
submitted to the Maryland Register for publication under § 10–112 of this subtitle, and in
accordance with § 10–111.2(c) of this subtitle, the promulgating unit shall submit the
proposed regulation to the Committee, the Department of Legislative Services, and the
Administrator.
(2) (i) If the proposed regulation, either in whole or in part, submitted
to the Committee and the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with paragraph
(1) of this subsection includes an increase or decrease in a fee for a license to practice any
business activity, business or health occupation, or business or health profession licensed
or otherwise regulated under State law, the promulgating unit shall include clearly written
explanatory reasons that justify the increase or decrease in the fee.
(3) If the promulgating unit estimates that the proposed regulation will
have a significant small business impact, the unit shall:
(i) establish an electronic registry that allows any small business or
other interested party to register to receive an electronic notification when the proposed
regulation or the scope of the proposed regulation is posted on the unit’s website in
accordance with item (ii) of this paragraph;
(ii) post the proposed regulation or the scope of the proposed
regulation on the unit’s website at least 15 days before the date the proposed regulation is
submitted to the Committee and the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
this section and provide an opportunity for comments on the unit’s proposal;
(iii) on posting a proposed regulation or the scope of the proposed
regulation on the unit’s website in accordance with item (ii) of this paragraph, notify the
parties registered in the electronic registry established under item (i) of this paragraph
that the proposed regulation or the scope of the proposed regulation has been posted; and
(iv) prepare a compliance guide written in clear, plain English to
assist small businesses in complying with the proposed regulation, update the guide as
needed until the regulation is final, and post the guide on the unit’s website.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.